Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2215
Reimbursable educational unit need.

Reimbursable educational unit need equals the amount calculated in subdivision (2)(d) of section 85-2223.

Laws 2007, LB342, § 15.
June 30, 2011